Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB391.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2102 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2102. Regulations.* * *(b.1) Regular antlered deer hunting season.--The regular antlered deer hunting season shall open on the first Monday following Thanksgiving.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314